Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-219
Mayor; executive powers; jurisdiction within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction.

The mayor of a city of the metropolitan class shall be the chief executive officer and conservator of the peace throughout the city. The mayor shall have such jurisdiction as may be vested in such office by ordinance over all places within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city, for the enforcement of any health and quarantine ordinance or regulations.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 18, p. 430;

C.S.1922, § 3544;

C.S.1929, § 14-219;

R.S.1943, § 14-219;

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 10;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 51.
July 21, 2022